Massachusetts, session 194th, H2990.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (B) of subdivision (1) of Section 13 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following after the
words “allowance becomes effective.”, the following:
“In the event circumstances beyond the retirement board’s control prevent the calculation
of the full monthly payment by the first such full payment date, the retirement board shall pay
90% of its estimated full monthly payment until such time as the circumstances beyond the
retirement board’s control are corrected. On an annual basis, the retirement board will notify the
House and the Senate of all circumstances beyond the retirement board’s control that prevented
the calculation of the full monthly payment by the first such full payment date.”
of 1